Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1210.
do enact as follows:AB1210,11Section 1. 49.688 (9) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,3,6249.688 (9) (b) A person who is convicted of violating a rule promulgated by the 3department under par. (a) in connection with that person’s furnishing of 4prescription drugs under this section is guilty of a Class H felony, except that, 5notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), 6whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more than $25,000.AB1210,27Section 2. 115.31 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,4,28115.31 (3) (a) 1. The person is charged with a crime under ch. 948, including 9a crime specified under s. 948.015, a felony with that, if committed before the 10effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], has a maximum term of 11imprisonment of at least 5 years or, if committed on or after the effective date of this 1subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 24 years, or a crime in which the victim was a child.AB1210,33Section 3. 132.20 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,4,104132.20 (2) Any person who, with intent to deceive, traffics or attempts to 5traffic in this state in a counterfeit mark or in any goods or service bearing or 6provided under a counterfeit mark is guilty of a Class H felony, except that, 7notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), 8whichever is applicable, if the person is an individual he or she may be fined not 9more than $250,000 and if the person is not an individual the person may be fined 10not more than $1,000,000.AB1210,411Section 4. 133.03 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,4,1812133.03 (1) Every contract, combination in the form of trust or otherwise, or 13conspiracy, in restraint of trade or commerce is illegal. Every person who makes 14any contract or engages in any combination or conspiracy in restraint of trade or 15commerce is guilty of a Class H felony, except that, notwithstanding the maximum 16fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), whichever is applicable, the person may 17be fined not more than $100,000 if a corporation, or, if any other person, may be 18fined not more than $50,000.AB1210,519Section 5. 133.03 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,5,220133.03 (2) Every person who monopolizes, or attempts to monopolize, or 21combines or conspires with any other person or persons to monopolize any part of 22trade or commerce is guilty of a Class H felony, except that, notwithstanding the 23maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), whichever is applicable, the 1person may be fined not more than $100,000 if a corporation, or, if any other person, 2may be fined not more than $50,000.AB1210,63Section 6. 146.345 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,5,64146.345 (3) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class H felony, 5except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) 6(h), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more than $50,000.AB1210,77Section 7. 157.06 (17) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,5,138157.06 (17) Prohibited acts related to records. Any person who 9intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a record of gift, an 10amendment or revocation of a record of gift, or a record of refusal for pecuniary gain 11is guilty of a Class H felony, except that notwithstanding the maximum fine 12specified in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), whichever is applicable, the person may be 13fined not more than $50,000.AB1210,814Section 8. 285.87 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,5,1915285.87 (2) (b) If the conviction under par. (a) is for a violation committed after 16another conviction under par. (a), the person is guilty of a Class I felony, except that, 17notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (i) or (3m) (i), 18whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more than $50,000 per day of 19violation.AB1210,920Section 9. 291.97 (2) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,5,2421291.97 (2) (b) (intro.) Any person who willfully does any of the following is 22guilty of a Class H felony, except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified 23in s. 939.50 (3) (h) or (3m) (h), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not 24more than $100,000:AB1210,101Section 10. 291.97 (2) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,6,52291.97 (2) (c) 1. For a 2nd or subsequent violation under par. (a), a person is 3guilty of a Class I felony, except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified 4in s. 939.50 (3) (i) or (3m) (i), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not 5more than $50,000.AB1210,116Section 11. 291.97 (2) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,6,107291.97 (2) (c) 2. For a 2nd or subsequent violation under par. (b), a person is 8guilty of a Class F felony, except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified 9in s. 939.50 (3) (f) or (3m) (f), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not 10more than $150,000.AB1210,1211Section 12. 299.53 (4) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,6,1712299.53 (4) (c) 2. Any person who intentionally makes any false statement or 13representation in complying with sub. (2) (a) shall be fined not more than $25,000 14or imprisoned for not more than one year in the county jail or both. For a 2nd or 15subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a Class I felony, except that, 16notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (i) or (3m) (i), 17whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more than $50,000.AB1210,1318Section 13. 302.113 (9g) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,6,2419302.113 (9g) (b) (intro.) An inmate who is serving a bifurcated sentence for a 20crime other than a crime specified in s. 941.29 (1g) (a); a crime specified in s. 941.29 21(1g) (b), not including s. 951.02, 951.08, 951.09, or 951.095; a crime under s. 948.02 22(3), 948.055, 948.075, or 948.095; or a Class A or B felony may seek modification of 23the bifurcated sentence in the manner specified in par. (f) if he or she meets one of 24the following criteria:AB1210,141Section 14. 302.113 (9g) (b) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 302.113 (9g) (b) 21. (intro.) and amended to read:AB1210,7,43302.113 (9g) (b) 1. (intro.) The inmate is 65 years of age or older and one of the 4following applies:AB1210,7,75a. For a sentence imposed for a crime that was committed before the effective 6date of this subd. 1. a. .... [LRB inserts date], the inmate has served at least 5 years 7of the term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated sentence.AB1210,158Section 15. 302.113 (9g) (b) 1. b. of the statutes is created to read:AB1210,7,129302.113 (9g) (b) 1. b. For a sentence imposed for a crime that was committed 10on or after the effective date of this subd. 1. b. .... [LRB inserts date], the inmate has 11served at least 3 years of the term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated 12sentence.AB1210,1613Section 16. 302.113 (9g) (b) 2. of the statutes is renumbered 302.113 (9g) (b) 142. (intro.) and amended to read:AB1210,7,1615302.113 (9g) (b) 2. (intro.) The inmate is 60 years of age or older and one of the 16following applies:AB1210,7,1917a. For a sentence imposed for a crime that was committed before the effective 18date of this subd. 2. a. .... [LRB inserts date], the inmate has served at least 10 years 19of the term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated sentence.AB1210,1720Section 17. 302.113 (9g) (b) 2. b. of the statutes is created to read:AB1210,7,2421302.113 (9g) (b) 2. b. For a sentence imposed for a crime that was committed 22on or after the effective date of this subd. 2. b. .... [LRB inserts date], the inmate has 23served at least 5 years of the term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated 24sentence.AB1210,181Section 18. 323.60 (11) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,8,42323.60 (11) (b) 1. For the first offense, the person is guilty of a Class I felony, 3except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 939.50 (3) (i) or (3m) 4(i), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more than $25,000.AB1210,195Section 19. 323.60 (11) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1210,8,96323.60 (11) (b) 2. For the 2nd and subsequent offenses, the person is guilty of 7a Class I felony, except that, notwithstanding the maximum fine specified in s. 8939.50 (3) (i) or (3m) (i), whichever is applicable, the person may be fined not more 9than $50,000. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1210 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1210 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1210 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1210 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1210: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting